Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.140

Appraiser—Oath—Duties.

The person appointed, before entering upon the performance of duties, must take an oath to faithfully perform the same. The appraiser must view the premises and appraise the market value thereof and, if the appraised value, less all liens and encumbrances, exceeds the homestead exemption, must determine whether the land claimed can be divided without material injury. Within fifteen days after appointment, the appraiser must make to the court a report in writing, which report must show the appraised value, less liens and encumbrances, and, if necessary, the determination whether or not the land can be divided without material injury and without violation of any governmental restriction.

[ 1987 c 442 s 214; 1895 c 64 s 14; RRS s 542. Formerly RCW 6.12.190.]